Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Pharmacy Technicians

§ 33-24-301.
Pharmacy technicians; licensing; definitions; revocation or suspension of license; letter of admonition; information required for background checks.

This section shall be known as the “Wyoming Pharmacy Technician Act.”

As used in this section:

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 7, § 2.

“Pharmacy functions” means those functions performed in a pharmacy department which do not require the professional judgment of a licensed pharmacist;

“Pharmacy technician” means an individual other than an intern, who performs pharmacy functions under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist.

A pharmacy technician shall not perform pharmacy functions unless under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist.

A licensed pharmacist shall be jointly responsible and liable for the actions of a pharmacy technician when supervision is required.

A pharmacy technician shall register and pay a fee to be licensed by the board before performing any pharmacy functions. The applicant shall provide relevant information pertaining to criminal, substance abuse, professional liability and licensure or certification history. A pharmacy technician license shall be renewed annually upon payment of the required renewal fee and upon providing information required.

The board may issue a letter of admonition or suspend or revoke a pharmacy technician’s license or the board may assess an administrative penalty against that person not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation for any:

Willful violation of any provision of this chapter or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971, or any amendments thereto;

Willful violation of any rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with this chapter or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971;

Action which threatens the public health, safety or welfare;

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor that relates to the practice of pharmacy or to the ability to practice as a pharmacy technician; or

Knowing submission of false or misleading information to the board in the application for a license or renewal of a license.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section including, but not limited to:

Qualifications, education and training required of pharmacy technicians;

Functions and services which may be performed by pharmacy technicians; and

Requirements for supervision by licensed pharmacists.

An applicant for a pharmacy technician license or a pharmacy technician-in-training permit shall provide the board with fingerprints, fees and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as authorized by W.S.

7-19-201

. The board may delay issuance of a license or permit pending the receipt of the information from the applicant’s background check.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 30, § 1; 1999, ch. 101, § 2; 2001, ch. 110, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (f) inserted “or the board may assess an administrative penalty against that person not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation” following “pharmacy technician's license”; added (f)(v); in (h) inserted “or a pharmacy technician-in-training permit” following “pharmacy technician license” and inserted “or permit” preceding “pending the receipt of the information.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (f)(iv), substituted “that relates to the practice of pharmacy or to the ability to practice as a pharmacy technician” for “involving moral turpitude” following “misdemeanor.”

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022, deleted “direct” preceding “supervision” throughout the section; and repealed former (b)(i), which read, “‘Direct supervision’ means that a licensed pharmacist shall be physically present and capable of observing the actions of a pharmacy technician.”

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971. —

See §

35-7-1001

.